zh-CN: 包括玩具绘画板/写字板配件: 收纳包; 充电线; 擦除工具; 备用手写笔; 说明书/活动手册; 备用电池; 印章; 镂空模板/模板; 手写笔; 手写笔挂绳/连接线; 其他
sv: Tillbehör för rittavla som ingår: Bärväska; Laddningskabel; Raderverktyg; Extra pekpenna; Instruktions-/aktivitetsbok; Reservbatterier; Stämplar; Stenciler/mallar; Pekpenna; Fästsnöre för pekpenna; Övrigt
cs: Přiložené příslušenství hračkového kreslicího tabletu: Přenosné pouzdro; Nabíjecí kabel; Guma (nástroj); Náhradní stylus; Návod / kniha s aktivitami; Náhradní baterie; Razítka; Šablony/předlohy; Stylus; Poutko/šňůrka na stylus; Jiné
vi: Phụ kiện đi kèm của bảng vẽ đồ chơi: Hộp đựng; Cáp sạc; Dụng cụ xóa; Bút cảm ứng tặng kèm; Sách hướng dẫn/hoạt động; Pin thay thế; Con dấu; Khuôn tô/mẫu; Bút cảm ứng; Dây buộc bút cảm ứng; Khác
pt-BR: Acessórios para a mesa digitalizadora incluídos: Estojo de transporte; Cabo de carregamento; Borracha; Caneta (stylus) extra; Livro de instruções/atividades; Baterias de substituição; Carimbos; Estêncil/modelos; Caneta (stylus); Cabo/cordão da caneta (stylus); Outros
nl: Inbegrepen accessoires speelgoedtekentablet: Draagtas; Oplaadkabel; Gum; Extra stylus; Instructie-/activiteitenboek; Vervangende batterijen; Stempels; Sjabloon/sjablonen; Stylus; Styluskoord; Overig
pl: Akcesoria dołączone do zabawkowego tabletu do rysowania: Etui do noszenia; Kabel do ładowania; Narzędzie do ścierania; Dodatkowy rysik; Instrukcja/książeczka z ćwiczeniami; Baterie wymienne; Pieczątki; Szablony; Rysik; Sznurek/linka do rysika; Inne
pt-PT: Acessórios incluídos com o tablet de desenho de brincar: Estojo de transporte; Cabo de carregamento; Ferramenta para apagar; Caneta digital extra; Livro de instruções/atividades; Pilhas de substituição; Carimbos; Escantilhão/modelos; Caneta digital; Fio/cordel para caneta digital; Outro
fi: Lelupiirtotabletin mukana tulevat oheislaitteet: Kantokotelo; Latauskaapeli; Pyyhekumityökalu; Ylimääräinen kynä; Ohje-/puuhakirja; Vaihtoparistot; Leimasimet; Sapluuna/mallit; Kynä; Kynän kiinnitysnaru/-johto; Muu
es: Accesorios incluidos de la tableta de dibujo de juguete: Estuche de transporte; Cable de carga; Herramienta de borrador; Lápiz táctil adicional; Libro de instrucciones/actividades; Pilas de repuesto; Sellos; Plantillas/estarcidos; Lápiz táctil; Correa/cable del lápiz táctil; Otro
ja: トイ描画タブレットアクセサリー付き: キャリーケース; 充電ケーブル; 消しゴムツール; 予備スタイラス; 取扱説明書 / アクティビティブック; 交換用電池; スタンプ; ステンシル / テンプレート; スタイラス; スタイラステザー / コード; その他
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pentru tableta de desenat de jucărie: Cutie de transport; Cablu de încărcare; Instrument de ștergere; Stylus suplimentar; Carte de instrucțiuni/activități; Baterii de schimb; Ștampile; Șabloane/modele; Stylus; Șnur/cablu pentru stylus; Altele
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci dječje ploče za crtanje: Torbica za nošenje; Kabel za punjenje; Alat za brisanje; Dodatni stilus; Knjižica s uputama/aktivnostima; Zamjenske baterije; Pečati; Šablone/predlošci; Stilus; Uzica/kabel za stilus; Ostalo
it: Accessori per tavoletta grafica per bambini inclusi: Custodia per il trasporto; Cavo di ricarica; Gomma per cancellare; Pennino aggiuntivo; Libretto di istruzioni/attività; Batterie di ricambio; Timbri; Stencil/sagome; Pennino; Cordicella/laccetto per pennino; Altro
hu: Játék rajztábla tartozékai a csomagban: Hordtok; Töltőkábel; Törlőeszköz; Tartalék érintőceruza; Útmutató / Foglalkoztató füzet; Csereakkumulátorok; Nyomdák; Sablonok / Mintaívek; Érintőceruza; Érintőceruza-rögzítő / zsinór; Egyéb
da: Medfølgende tilbehør til legetøjstegnetablet: Bæretaske; Opladerkabel; Sletteværktøj; Ekstra stylus; Vejledning/aktivitetsbog; Ekstra batterier; Stempler; Stencil/skabeloner; Stylus; Snor/kabel til stylus; Andet
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ παιδικού tablet σχεδίασης: Θήκη μεταφοράς; Καλώδιο φόρτισης; Εργαλείο γόμας; Επιπλέον γραφίδα; Βιβλίο οδηγιών/δραστηριοτήτων; Ανταλλακτικές μπαταρίες; Σφραγίδες; Στένσιλ/πρότυπα; Γραφίδα; Κορδόνι/ιμάντας γραφίδας; Άλλο
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo k hračkárskym tabletom na kreslenie v cene: Prenosné puzdro; Nabíjací kábel; Guma; Náhradný stylus; Návod/knižka aktivít; Náhradné batérie; Pečiatky; Šablóny; Stylus; Šnúrka/lanko na stylus; Iné
nb: Inkludert tilbehør i tegnebrett til lek: Bæreveske; Ladekabel; Viskeverktøy; Ekstra pekepenn; Instruksjons-/aktivitetsbok; Reservebatterier; Stempler; Sjablong/maler; Pekepenn; Snor til pekepenn; Annet
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за детски таблет за рисуване: Калъф за носене; Кабел за зареждане; Инструмент за изтриване; Допълнителен стилус; Книжка с инструкции/занимания; Резервни батерии; Печати; Шаблони/макети; Стилус; Връв/кабел за стилус; Друго
ru: Аксессуары планшета для рисования: Чехол для переноски; Кабель для зарядки; Ластик; Дополнительный стилус; Инструкция/буклет с заданиями; Запасные батарейки; Штампы; Трафареты/шаблоны; Стилус; Шнурок/ремешок для стилуса; Другое
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za otroško risalno tablico: Kovček za prenašanje; Polnilni kabel; Radirka; Dodatno pisalo; Knjiga z navodili/aktivnostmi; Nadomestne baterije; Štampiljke; Šablone/predloge; Pisalo; Trak/vrvica za pisalo; Drugo
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับแท็บเล็ตวาดภาพของเล่นที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: กล่องเก็บแบบพกพา; สายชาร์จ; ยางลบ; สไตลัสเพิ่มเติม; คู่มือ/หนังสือทำกิจกรรม; แบตเตอรี่สำรอง; ตัวปั๊ม; สเตนซิล/แม่แบบ; สไตลัส; สายรัด/สายคล้องสไตลัส; อื่นๆ
ko: 어린이 드로잉 패드 액세서리 포함: 휴대용 케이스; 충전 케이블; 지우개 도구; 여분 스타일러스; 설명서/액티비티 북; 교체용 배터리; 스탬프; 스텐실/템플릿; 스타일러스; 스타일러스 테더/코드; 기타
fr: Accessoires pour tablette graphique inclus: Étui de transport; Câble de charge; Outil gomme; Stylet supplémentaire; Livre d’instructions/d’activités; Piles de rechange; Tampons; Pochoir/modèles; Stylet; Attache/cordon pour stylet; Autre
en: Toy drawing tablet accessories included: Carrying case; Charging cable; Eraser tool; Extra stylus; Instruction/activity book; Replacement batteries; Stamps; Stencil/templates; Stylus; Stylus tether/cord; Other
de: Enthaltenes Zubehör für das Spielzeug-Zeichentablett: Tragetasche; Ladekabel; Radierwerkzeug; Zusätzlicher Eingabestift; Anleitungs-/Aktivitätsbuch; Ersatzbatterien; Stempel; Schablone/Vorlagen; Eingabestift; Stiftband/-kordel; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 包含玩具畫板配件: 收納盒; 充電線; 橡皮擦; 備用觸控筆; 說明/活動手冊; 替換電池; 印章; 模板/範本; 觸控筆; 觸控筆掛繩/繫繩; 其他
tr: Dahil olan oyuncak çizim tableti aksesuarları: Taşıma çantası; Şarj kablosu; Silgi aracı; Ekstra kalem; Talimat/etkinlik kitabı; Yedek piller; Damgalar; Şablon/şablonlar; Kalem; Kalem bağı/kordonu; Diğer
lt-LT: Pridedami žaislinių piešimo planšečių priedai: Nešiojimo dėklas; Įkrovimo laidas; Trynimo įrankis; Papildomas rašiklis; Instrukcijų / užduočių knygelė; Keičiamos baterijos; Antspaudai; Trafaretai / šablonai; Rašiklis; Rašiklio laidas / virvelė; Kita